District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1813.03

Additions to tax — Fraud.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 356, ch. 258, art. I, title XIII, § 3
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-209, § 404(d), 34 DCR 689
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(dd)(2), 48 DCR 334

History

1981 Ed., § 47-1813.3.
1973 Ed., § 47-1589b.

Prior Codifications

Section 601(b) of D.C. Law 6-209 provided that title III and sections 401, 402, 404, 405 and 406 of the act shall take effect on October 1, 1987.

Effective Dates

Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”

Editor's Notes